en: Norwegian sea products
bg: Норвежки морски продукти
de: Norwegische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar noruegos
fr: Produits de la mer norvégiens
hr: Norveški morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici norvegesi

en: Portuguese sea products
de: Portugiesische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar portugueses
fr: Produits de la mer portuguais
hr: Portugalski morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici portoghesi

en: Romanian sea products
bg: Румънски морски продукти
de: Rumänische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar rumanos
fr: Produits de la mer roumains
hr: Rumunjski morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici rumeni

en: Spanish sea products
bg: Испански морски продукти
es: Productos marinos españoles
fr: Produits de la mer espagnols
hr: Španjolski morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti marini spagnoli

en: Sardine fillets in olive oil
fr: Filets de sardines à l’huile d’olive, filets de sardine à l'huile d'olive
hr: Fileti sardina u maslinovom ulju
nl: Sardientjesfilets op olijfolie

en: Canned European pilchard in olive oil, canned sardine in olive oil
fr: Sardine à l'huile d'olive appertisée

en: Tinned Mackerels
de: Makrelen in Kupferdosen
es: Caballas enlatadas
fi: purkitettuja makrilleja
fr: Maquereaux en conserve
hr: Konzervirane skuše
it: Sgombro in lattina
nl: Makreel in blik/pot

en: Crustaceans
ca: Crustacis
de: Krebs, Krebse
es: Crustáceos
fi: äyriäiset
fr: Crustacés
hr: Rakovi
it: Crostacei
ja: 甲殻類
nl: Kreeftachtigen
pt: Crustáceos, crustáceo
se: Kräftdjur
sv: Kräftdjur

en: Spider crab
de: Spinnenkrabbe
es: Cangrejo araña
fr: Araignées de mer
hr: Morski pauk
it: Granchio ragno
nl: Zeespinnen

en: Crab
de: Krabben, Krabbe
es: Cangrejo
fi: rapu
fr: Crabes
hr: Rak
it: Granchi
ja: 蟹, カニ
nl: Krab

en: Frozen crab
fr: Crabes surgelés

en: Preparations made from crabs
de: Zubereitungen aus Krabben
es: Preparado hechos de cangrejos
fr: Préparations à base de crabes
hr: Pripravci od rakova
nl: Krab-producten

en: Flaked crab
fr: Miettes de crabe

en: Decorticated crab leg
fr: Pattes de crabe décortiquées

en: Boiled crab, Crab cooked in water
fr: Crabe bouilli, Crabe cuit à l'eau, Tourteau bouilli, Tourteau cuit à l'eau

en: Frozen cooked crab
de: Tiefgekochter Krebs
es: Cangrejo cocido congelado
fr: Crabe cuit surgelé
hr: Smrznuti kuhani rak
nl: Bevroren gekookte krab

en: Crayfish
fr: Écrevisse
hr: Račići
ja: ザリガニ
nl: Rivierkreeft

en: Cooked crayfish
fr: Écrevisse cuite

en: Frozen crayfish
fr: Écrevisse surgelée

en: Frozen cooked crayfish
fr: Écrevisse cuite surgelée